Arkansas, session 2025, HB1287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-99-1202, concerning definitions used
under the Healthcare Contracting Simplification Act, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(14) "Downcode" means to change a claim to a lower-cost
healthcare service than what was contained in the original claim that a
healthcare provider submitted or billed to a contracting entity.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 99, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-99-1211. Notice required for downcode of claim.
A contracting entity that downcodes a claim submitted by a healthcare
*ANS040*
02-10-2025 10:10:48 ANS040

As Engrossed: H2/10/25 HB1287
provider shall provide notice to the healthcare provider of the downcoding
within thirty (30) days of processing the claim.

/s/L. Johnson
































02-10-2025 10:10:48 ANS040